Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.360

Agreement and order provisions for marketing information, services, verification of grades, standards, sampling, etc.

Any marketing agreement or order may provide for marketing information and services to producers and for the verification of grades, standards, weights, tests and sampling of quality and quantity of the agricultural product purchased by handlers from producers.

[ 1961 c 256 s 36.]